Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-338
No person required to perform an abortion; no liability for refusal.

No person shall be required to perform or participate in any abortion, and the refusal of any person to participate in an abortion shall not be a basis for civil liability to any person. No hospital, governing board, or any other person, firm, association, or group shall terminate the employment or alter the position of, prevent or impair the practice or occupation of, or impose any other sanction or otherwise discriminate against any person who refuses to participate in an abortion.

Laws 1977, LB 38, § 53.